pt-PT: Componentes do kit de reparação de tecidos incluídos: Aplicador/espátula; Cola/adesivo para tecidos; Fita de tecido; Rede termocolante; Película de selagem térmica; Folha de instruções; Folhas adesivas termocolantes; Agulha(s); Remendos; Lixa/lima (para preparação da superfície); Tesoura; Descosedor; Dedal; Linha; Outro
vi: Các thành phần có trong bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa vải: Dụng cụ bôi/thìa; Keo/chất kết dính vải; Băng keo vải; Màng keo nhiệt; Màng ép nhiệt; Tờ hướng dẫn; Tấm keo ủi; Kim; Miếng vá; Giấy nhám/cây dũa móng (để chuẩn bị bề mặt); Kéo; Dụng cụ rọc đường chỉ; Đê khâu; Chỉ; Khác
lt-LT: Įtraukti audinio taisymo rinkinio komponentai: Aplikatorius / mentelė; Audinių klijai; Audinio juosta; Klijuojamasis voratinklis; Lydomoji plėvelė; Instrukcijų lapas; Užlyginami klijų lapai; Adata (-os); Lopai; Švitrinis popierius / dildė (paviršiui paruošti); Žirklės; Siūlių ardiklis; Antpirštis; Siūlai; Kita
fr: Composants fournis dans le kit de réparation pour tissu: Applicateur/spatule; Colle/adhésif pour tissu; Ruban pour tissu; Voile thermocollant; Film thermoscellant; Feuille d’instructions; Feuilles adhésives thermocollantes; Aiguille(s); Pièces; Papier de verre/lime en carton (pour la préparation de la surface); Ciseaux; Découd-vite; Dé à coudre; Fil; Autre
th: ส่วนประกอบที่มีมาให้ในชุดซ่อมแซมผ้า: อุปกรณ์ทา/ไม้ปาด; กาวติดผ้า; เทปผ้า; แผ่นกาวรีดติดผ้า; ฟิล์มซีลด้วยความร้อน; แผ่นคำแนะนำ; แผ่นกาวรีดติด; เข็ม; แผ่นปะ; กระดาษทราย/ตะไบ (สำหรับเตรียมพื้นผิว); กรรไกร; ที่เลาะด้าย; ปลอกนิ้ว; ด้าย; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплекта за поправка на плат: Апликатор/шпатула; Лепило за текстил; Текстилна лента; Подлепваща мрежа; Термозалепващо фолио; Лист с инструкции; Подлепващи листове за гладене; Игли; Кръпки; Шкурка/пила (за подготовка на повърхността); Ножици; Разпорвач; Напръстник; Конец; Друго
tr: Kumaş tamir kit bileşenleri şunları içerir:: Aplikatör/spatula; Kumaş tutkalı/yapıştırıcısı; Kumaş bandı; Eriyebilir tela; Isıyla yapışan film; Talimat sayfası; Ütüyle yapışan tabakalar; İğne(ler); Yamalar; Zımpara kağıdı/zımpara törpü (yüzey hazırlığı için); Makas; Dikiş sökücü; Yüksük; İplik; Diğer
ro-RO: Componentele kitului de reparare a țesăturilor sunt incluse: Aplicator/spatulă; Lipici/adeziv pentru textile; Bandă textilă; Pânză fuzibilă; Folie de sigilare termică; Foaie de instrucțiuni; Foi adezive termocolante; Ac(e); Petice; Șmirghel/pilă (pentru pregătirea suprafeței); Foarfece; Dispozitiv de desfăcut cusături; Degetar; Ață; Altele
nl: Stofreparatieset meegeleverde componenten: Applicator/spatel; Textiellijm; Textieltape; Plakvlies; Warmtelasfolie; Instructieblad; Opstrijkbare kleefvellen; Naald(en); Patches; Schuurpapier/vijl (voor oppervlaktevoorbereiding); Schaar; Tornmesje; Vingerhoed; Garen; Overig
hr-HR: Uključene su kompletne komponente za popravak tkanine: Aplikator/lopatica; Ljepilo za tkaninu; Traka za tkaninu; Ljepljiva mreža; Toplinska folija; List s uputama; Ljepljivi listovi na peglanje; Igle; Zakrpe; Brusni papir / turpija (za pripremu površine); Škare; Paralica; Naprstak; Konac; Ostalo
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu naprawczego do tkanin: Aplikator / szpatułka; Klej do tkanin; Taśma do tkanin; Siatka termoprzylepna; Folia termozgrzewalna; Instrukcja; Arkusze termoprzylepne; Igła(-y); Łatki; Papier ścierny / pilnik (do przygotowania powierzchni); Nożyczki; Prujka; Naparstek; Nici; Inne
ru: Компоненты набора для ремонта ткани в комплекте: Аппликатор/лопаточка; Клей для ткани; Тканевая лента; Клеевая паутинка; Термосвариваемая пленка; Инструкция; Приутюживаемые клеевые листы; Иглы; Заплатки; Наждачная бумага/пилочка (для подготовки поверхности); Ножницы; Вспарыватель для швов; Наперсток; Нитки; Другое
ko: 원단 수선 키트 구성품: 어플리케이터/스패출라; 패브릭 글루/접착제; 패브릭 테이프; 접착심지; 열접착 필름; 사용 설명서; 다리미용 접착 시트; 바늘; 패치; 사포/에머리 보드(표면 준비용); 가위; 실뜯개; 골무; 실; 기타
zh-CN: 面料修补套件所含组件: 涂抹器/抹刀; 织物胶水/粘合剂; 织物胶带; 热熔网膜; 热封膜; 说明书; 熨烫粘合片; 缝纫针; 补丁贴; 砂纸/砂条（用于表面预处理）; 剪刀; 拆线刀; 顶针; 缝纫线; 其他
sk-SK: Súčasťou sú komponenty súpravy na opravu tkaniny: Aplikátor/špachtľa; Lepidlo na látky; Páska na látky; Zažehľovacia pavučinka; Teplom uzatvárateľná fólia; List s pokynmi; Nažehľovacie lepiace fólie; Ihly; Záplaty; Brúsny papier/pilník (na prípravu povrchu); Nožnice; Párač švov; Náprstok; Niť; Iné
de: Enthaltene Bestandteile des Stoffreparatursets: Applikator/Spatel; Textilkleber/-klebstoff; Stoffklebeband; Bügelvlies; Heißsiegelfolie; Gebrauchsanweisung; Bügelklebefolien; Nadel(n); Flicken; Schleifpapier/Schmirgelfeile (zur Oberflächenvorbereitung); Schere; Nahttrenner; Fingerhut; Garn; Sonstiges
nb: Komponenter til reparasjonssett for stoff inkludert: Applikator/spatel; Stofflim/klebemiddel; Stoffteip; Strykeinnlegg; Varmeforseglingsfilm; Bruksanvisning; Stryke-på-limark; Nål(er); Lapper; Sandpapir/neglefil (for overflatebehandling); Saks; Sprettekniv; Fingerbøl; Tråd; Annet
sl-SI: Kompletne komponente za popravilo tkanin so vključene: Aplikator/lopatica; Lepilo za tkanine; Trak za tkanine; Taljiva mreža; Folija za toplotno zapiranje; Navodila za uporabo; Lepilne pole za likanje; Igle; Zaplate; Brusni papir/pilica (za pripravo površine); Škarje; Paralica; Naperstek; Nit; Drugo
cs: Součástí balení jsou i součástky pro opravu látek: Aplikátor/špachtle; Lepidlo na textil; Textilní páska; Zažehlovací pavučinka; Nažehlovací fólie; Návod k použití; Zažehlovací lepicí archy; Jehly; Záplaty; Brusný papír / pilník (pro přípravu povrchu); Nůžky; Páráček; Náprstek; Nit; Jiné
hu: Szövetjavító készlethez mellékelt tartozékok: Applikátor/spatula; Textilragasztó; Textilszalag; Vasalható vetex; Hőhegesztő fólia; Útmutató lap; Felvasalható ragasztóívek; Tű(k); Foltok; Csiszolópapír/reszelő (felület-előkészítéshez); Olló; Varratbontó; Gyűszű; Cérna; Egyéb
sv: Ingående komponenter i tygreparationssatsen: Applikator/spatel; Textillim; Tygtejp; Påstrykbart mellanlägg; Värmeförseglande film; Instruktionsblad; Påstrykbara limark; Nål(ar); Lappar; Sandpapper/nagelfil (för ytpreparering); Sax; Sprättare; Fingerborg; Tråd; Övrigt
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα κιτ επιδιόρθωσης υφάσματος: Απλικατέρ/σπάτουλα; Κόλλα/συγκολλητική ουσία υφασμάτων; Υφασμάτινη ταινία; Θερμοκολλητικό πλέγμα; Μεμβράνη θερμοσυγκόλλησης; Φύλλο οδηγιών; Κολλητικά φύλλα που σιδερώνονται; Βελόνες; Μπαλώματα; Γυαλόχαρτο/λίμα (για προετοιμασία επιφάνειας); Ψαλίδι; Ξηλωτήρι; Δαχτυλήθρα; Νήμα; Άλλο
en: Fabric repair kit components included: Applicator/spatula; Fabric glue/adhesive; Fabric tape; Fusible web; Heat sealing film; Instruction sheet; Iron-on adhesive sheets; Needle(s); Patches; Sandpaper/emery board (for surface prep); Scissors; Seam ripper; Thimble; Thread; Other
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos no kit de reparo de tecido: Aplicador/espátula; Cola/adesivo para tecido; Fita para tecido; Entretela termocolante; Filme de selagem térmica; Folha de instruções; Folhas adesivas termocolantes; Agulha(s); Remendos; Lixa/lixa de unha (para preparação da superfície); Tesoura; Abridor de costuras; Dedal; Linha; Outros
it: Componenti del kit di riparazione tessuti inclusi: Applicatore/spatola; Colla/adesivo per tessuti; Nastro per tessuti; Adesivo termofusibile; Pellicola termosaldante; Foglio di istruzioni; Fogli adesivi da stirare; Aghi; Toppe; Carta vetrata/limetta (per preparazione superficie); Forbici; Scucitore; Ditale; Filo; Altro
da: Komponenter til tekstilreparationssæt, der medfølger: Applikator/spatel; Stoflim/klæbemiddel; Stoftape; Dobbeltklæbende vlies; Varmeforseglingsfilm; Vejledning; Strygeklæbeark; Nål(e); Lapper; Sandpapir/neglefil (til overfladeforberedelse); Saks; Opsprætter; Fingerbøl; Tråd; Andet
ja: 布地補修キットコンポーネント付き: アプリケーター/スパチュラ; 布用ボンド/接着剤; ファブリックテープ; フューズブルウェブ; ヒートシールフィルム; 取扱説明書; アイロン接着シート; 針; パッチ; サンドペーパー/エメリーボード (表面処理用); はさみ; リッパー; 指ぬき; 糸; その他
zh-TW: 布料修補套件內含組件: 塗抹器/抹刀; 布用膠水/黏合劑; 布用膠帶; 熱熔網膜; 熱封膜; 說明書; 熨燙式黏合片; 針; 補丁; 砂紙/金剛砂紙板 (用於表面處理); 剪刀; 拆線刀; 頂針; 線; 其他
es: Componentes del kit de reparación de telas incluidos: Aplicador/espátula; Pegamento/adhesivo para tela; Cinta de tela; Entretela termoadhesiva; Película de sellado por calor; Hoja de instrucciones; Láminas adhesivas para planchar; Agujas; Parches; Papel de lija/lima (para preparar la superficie); Tijeras; Descosedor; Dedal; Hilo; Otros
fi: Kankaan korjaussarjan sisältö: Levitin/lasta; Kangasliima; Kangasteippi; Kaksipuolinen liimaharso; Kuumasaumauskalvo; Ohjelehtinen; Silitettävät liima-arkit; Neulat; Paikat; Hiekkapaperi/hiomaviila (pinnan esikäsittelyyn); Sakset; Saumanpurkaja; Sormustin; Lanka; Muu